pl: Rozmiar rękawic: Podwójnie bardzo duży (XXL); Bardzo duży (XL); Bardzo mały (XS); Duży (L); Średni (M); Rozmiar uniwersalny; Mały (S); Potrójnie bardzo duży (XXXL); Inne
bg-BG: Размер на аксесоар за ръце: Двойно екстра голям (XXL); Екстра голям (XL); Екстра малък (XS); Голям (L); Среден (M); Универсален размер; Малък (S); Тройно екстра голям (XXXL); Друго
nb: Hanskestørrelse: Dobbel ekstra stor (XXL); Ekstra stor (XL); Ekstra liten (XS); Stor (L); Medium (M); Én størrelse; Liten (S); Trippel ekstra stor (XXXL); Annet
nl: Handschoenmaat: Extra extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Extra extra extra large (XXXL); Overig
tr: El giyim bedeni: Çift ekstra büyük (XXL); Ekstra büyük (XL); Ekstra küçük (XS); Büyük (L); Orta (M); Tek beden; Küçük (S); Üç ekstra büyük (XXXL); Diğer
sv: Storlek på handskar: Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Övrigt
fi: Käsineen tyyppi: Kaksois-erikoissuuri (XXL); Erikoissuuri (XL); Erikoispieni (XS); Suuri (L); Keskikoko (M); Yksi koko; Pieni (S); Kolminkertainen erikoissuuri (XXXL); Muu
el: Μέγεθος εξοπλισμού χεριών: Διπλό extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Ένα μέγεθος; Small (S); Τριπλό extra large (XXXL); Άλλο
hr-HR: Veličina rukavica: Dvostruko iznimno velika (XXL); Iznimno velika (XL); Iznimno mala (XS); Velika (L); Srednja (M); Univerzalna veličina; Mala (S); Trostruko iznimno velika (XXXL); Ostalo
sl-SI: Velikost rokavic: Dvojno zelo veliko (XXL); Zelo veliko (XL); Zelo majhno (XS); Veliko (L); Srednje (M); Ena velikost; Majhno (S); Trojno zelo veliko (XXXL); Drugo
lt-LT: Pirštinių dydis: Labai labai didelis (XXL); Labai didelis (XL); Labai mažas (XS); Didelis (L); Vidutinis (M); Vieno dydžio; Mažas (S); Trigubai labai didelis (XXXL); Kita
zh-TW: 手飾尺寸: 雙加大 (XXL); 加大 (XL); 加小 (XS); 大 (L); 中 (M); 單一尺寸; 小 (S); 三加大 (XXXL); 其他
sk-SK: Veľkosť rukavíc: Dvojité extra veľké (XXL); Extra veľké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Veľké (L); Stredné (M); Univerzálna veľkosť; Malé (S); Trojité extra veľké (XXXL); Iné
en: Handwear size: Double extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Triple extra large (XXXL); Other
pt-BR: Tamanho de luvas: Extra extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Pequeno (S); Triplo extra grande (XXXL); Outro
it: Taglia della guanteria: Doppia extra large (XXL); Extra large (XL); Extra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); Taglia unica; Small (S); Tripla extra large (XXXL); Altro
da: Handskestørrelse: Dobbelt ekstra large (XXL); Ekstra large (XL); Ekstra small (XS); Large (L); Medium (M); One size; Small (S); Tredobbelt ekstra large (XXXL); Andet
de: Handschuhgröße: Doppel-Extragroß (XXL); Extragroß (XL); Extraklein (XS); Groß (L); Mittel (M); Einheitsgröße; Klein (S); Dreifach-Extragroß (XXXL); Sonstige
zh-CN: 手套尺码: 双加大码（XXL）; 加大码（XL）; 加小码（XS）; 大码（L）; 中码（M）; 均码; 小码（S）; 三加大码（XXXL）; 其他
pt-PT: Tamanho das luvas: Duplo extragrande (XXL); Extragrande (XL); Extrapequeno (XS); Grande (L); Médio (M); Tamanho único; Pequeno (S); Triplo extragrande (XXXL); Outro
vi: Kích thước găng tay: Rất rất lớn (XXL); Rất lớn (XL); Rất nhỏ (XS); Lớn (L); Trung bình (M); Một cỡ; Nhỏ (S); Rất lớn mức 3 (XXXL); Khác
fr: Taille des gants: Double très grand (XXL); Très grand (XL); Très petit (XS); Grand (L); Moyen (M); Taille unique; Petit (S); Triple très grand (XXXL); Autre
es: Tamaño de las prendas de manos: Doble extra grande (XXL); Extra grande (XL); Extra pequeña (XS); Grande (L); Mediana (M); Talla única; Pequeña (S); Triple extra grande (XXXL); Otra
ja: ハンドウェアサイズ: 2XL (XXL); XL; XS; L; M; ワンサイズ; S; 3XL (XXXL); その他
ko: 장갑 크기: 더블 엑스트라 라지(XXL); 엑스트라 라지(XL); 엑스트라 스몰(XS); 라지(L); 미디엄(M); 원사이즈; 스몰(S); 트리플 엑스트라 라지(XXXL); 기타
cs: Velikost rukavic: Dvojité extra velké (XXL); Extra velké (XL); Extra malé (XS); Velké (L); Střední (M); Univerzální; Malé (S); Trojité extra velké (XXXL); Jiná
ro-RO: Mărime pentru mănuși: Dublu extra large (XXL); Foarte mare (XL); Foarte mic (XS); Mare (L); Mediu (M); Mărime universală; Mic (S); Triplu extra large (XXXL); Altele
ru: Размер перчаток: Двойной очень большой (XXL); Очень большой (XL); Очень маленький (XS); Большой (L); Средний (M); Единый размер; Маленький (S); Тройной очень большой (XXXL); Другое
th: ขนาดถุงมือ: ใหญ่พิเศษ 2 เท่า (XXL); ใหญ่พิเศษ (XL); เล็กพิเศษ (XS); ใหญ่ (L); กลาง (M); ฟรีไซซ์; เล็ก (S); ใหญ่พิเศษ 3 เท่า (XXXL); อื่นๆ
hu: Kézvédő mérete: Dupla extra nagy (XXL); Extra nagy (XL); Extra kicsi (XS); Nagy (L); Közepes (M); Egyméretes; Kicsi (S); Tripla extra nagy (XXXL); Egyéb